nl: Lampenkapvorm: Klok; Kegel; Cilinder; Koepel; Cilindervormig; Empire; Bol; Hexagon; Zandloper; Nieuwigheid; Geplooid; Rechthoekig; Vierkant; Taps toelopend; Overig
zh-CN: 灯罩形状: 钟形; 圆锥形; 圆柱形; 圆顶形; 鼓形; 帝政式; 球形; 六边形; 沙漏形; 创意款; 褶皱; 矩形; 方形; 锥形; 其他
da: Lampeskærms form: Klokke; Kegle; Cylinder; Kuppel; Tromme; Empire; Globus; Hexagon; Timeglas; Moderne; Plisseret; Rektangulær; Firkant; Tapered; Andet
vi: Hình dáng chao đèn: Chuông; Hình nón; Hình trụ; Mái vòm; Hình trống; Kiểu Empire; Hình cầu; Hình lục giác; Đồng hồ cát; Độc lạ; Xếp ly; Chữ nhật; Vuông; Vót nhọn; Khác
it: Forma del paralume: Campana; Cono; Cilindro; Cupola; Tamburo; Stile Impero; Globo; Esagono; Clessidra; Novità; Pieghettato; Rettangolare; Quadrato; Affusolato; Altro
bg-BG: Форма на абажура: Камбана; Конусно; Цилиндър; Купол; Цилиндрично; Имперски; Глобус; Шестоъгълник; Пясъчен часовник; Нестандартнo; Плисирано; Правоъгълно; Квадрат; Конусовидно; Друго
hu: Lámpaernyő formája: Harang; Tölcsér; Henger; Kupola; Dob; Empire stílusú; Gömb; Hatlapú; Homokóra; Újszerű; Redőzött; Téglalap; Négyszög; Kúpos; Egyéb
ro-RO: Forma abajurului: Clopot; Con; Cilindru; Sferic; Tambur; Empire; Glob; Hexagonal; Clepsidră; Inovator; Plisat; Dreptunghiular; Pătrat; Conic; Altele
el: Σχήμα καπέλου φωτιστικού: Κωδωνοειδές; Κώνος; Κυλινδρικό; Θολωτό; Τύπου Drum; Τύπου Empire; Σφαιρικό; Εξαγωνικό; Κλεψύδρα; Πρωτότυπο; Πλισέ; Ορθογώνιο; Τετράγωνο; Κωνικό; Άλλο
hr-HR: Oblik sjenila za lampe: Zvono; Čunj; Cilindar; Kupola; Bubanj; Empire stil; Globus; Šesterokutna; Pješčani sat; Novo; Plisirana; Pravokutni; Kvadratno; Suženog vrha; Ostalo
es: Forma de la pantalla de lámpara: Campana; Cono; Cilindro; Cúpula; Tambor; Empire; Globo; Hexágono; Reloj de arena; Novedoso; Plisada; Rectangular; Cuadrado; Cónico; Otros
cs: Tvar stínítka lampy: Zvone; Kužel; Válec; Kupole; Buben; Empírové; Koule; Šestihran; Přesýpací hodiny; Netradiční; Plisované; Obdélník; Čtverec; Kónické; Jiné
ru: Форма абажура: Колокол; Конус; Цилиндр; Купол; Барабан; Ампир; Шар; Шестигранная; Песочные часы; Нестандартная; Плиссе; Прямоугольная; Квадратная; Зауженная; Другая
sk-SK: Tvar tienidla: Zvon; Kužeľ; Valec; Kupola; Bubon; Empírové; Guľa; Šesťhranné; Presýpacie hodiny; Novinka; Plisované; Obdĺžnikové; Hranaté; Zúžené; Iné
sv: Shapes: Klocka; Kon; Cylinder; Kupol; Trumma; Empire; Glob; Sexhörning; Timglas; Nyhet; Plisserad; Rektangulär; Fyrkantig; Konisk; Övrigt
th: รูปทรงของโคมไฟ: กระดิ่ง; ทรงกรวย; กระบอก; โดม; ทรงกระบอก; ทรงกรวยคว่ำ; ทรงกลมลูกโลก; หกเหลี่ยม; นาฬิกาทราย; แปลกใหม่; จีบพับ; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; สี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; ตัดเฉียง; อื่นๆ
pl: Kształt abażuru: Dzwon; Stożkowe; Cylinder; Kopuła; Bęben; Empire; Kula; Sześciokąt; Klepsydra; Ozdobne; Plisowane; Prostokątne; Kwadratowe; Zwężane; Pozostałe
zh-TW: 燈罩形狀: 鐘形; 錐形; 圓柱形; 圓頂形; 鼓形; 帝政風; 球形; 六邊形; 沙漏形; 新奇; 活褶; 長方形; 方形; 錐形; 其他
tr: Abajur şekli: Çan; Koni; Silindir; Kubbe; Kısa silindir; Empire; Küre; Altıgen; Kum saati; Eğlenceli; Pileli; Dikdörtgen; Kare; Ucu daralan; Diğer
fi: Lampunvarjostimen muoto: Kello; Kartio; Sylinteri; Kupoli; Rumpu; Empire; Pallo; Kuusikulmio; Tiimalasi; Omaperäinen; Laskostettu; Suorakulmainen; Neliömäinen; Kapeneva; Muu
ko: 램프 쉐이드 형태: 벨; 원뿔; 실린더; 돔; 드럼; 엠파이어; 구체; 육각형; 아워글래스; 노벨티; 플리츠; 직사각형; 스퀘어; 테이퍼드; 기타
lt-LT: Lempos gaubto forma: Varpelis; Gaubtas; Cilindras; Kupolo formos; Būgnas; Ampyro; Gaublys; Šešiakampis; Smėlio laikrodis; Dekoratyvinė; Plisuota; Stačiakampė; Kvadratas; Smailėjanti; Kita
nb: Lampeskjermens form: Bjelle; Kjegle; Sylinder; Kuppel; Tromme; Empire; Klode; Heksagon; Timeglass; Nyhet; Plissert; Rektangulær; Firkantet; Avsmalnet; Annet
pt-BR: Formato da cúpula da luminária: Sino; Cone; Cilindro; Cúpula; Tambor; Império; Globo; Hexágono; Ampulheta; Novidade; Plissada; Retangular; Quadrado; Cônico; Outro
ja: ランプシェードの形状: ベル; 円錐形; 円筒形; ドーム; ドラム; エンパイア; グローブ; 六角形; アワーグラス型; おもしろグラス; プリーツ入り; 長方形; スクエア; テーパード; その他
pt-PT: Forma do abajur: Sino; Cone; Cilindro; Cúpula; Tambor; Império; Globo; Hexágono; Ampulheta; Original; Plissado; Retangular; Quadrado; Afunilado; Outro
de: Lampenschirmform: Glocke; Kegel; Zylinder; Kuppel; Trommel; Empire; Kugelförmig; Sechseck; Sanduhrform; Neuheit; Falten; Rechteckig; Quadrat; Abgeschrägt; Sonstiges
en: Lampshade shape: Bell; Cone; Cylinder; Dome; Drum; Empire; Globe; Hexagon; Hourglass; Novelty; Pleated; Rectangular; Square; Tapered; Other
fr: Forme de l’abat-jour: Cloche; Cône; Cylindre; Dôme; Tambour; Empire; Globe; Hexagone; Sablier; Nouveauté; Plissé; Rectangulaire; Carré; Conique; Autre
sl-SI: Oblika senčnika svetilke: Zvonec; Stožec; Cilinder; Kupolasta; Bobenska; Empire; Globus; Šestkotna; Peščena ura; Poseben; Naguban; Pravokotno; Kvadratna; Zožena; Druga